Utah statutes.
36-12-2.   Standing committees.
Each house of the Legislature at the beginning of each general session shall
organize itself into standing committees for the consideration of proposed
legislation. The committees shall be organized, their duties determined, and
their membership appointed as the rules of each house shall prescribe. This
section shall not be construed to prevent the creation of subcommittees,
special committees, or ad hoc committees which each house may organize.
